Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Note

Sections 669-1 to 669-8 designated as Part I by L 1997, c
131, §3.

§669-1 Object of action. (a) Action
may be brought by any person against another person who claims, or who may
claim adversely to the plaintiff, an estate or interest in real property, for
the purpose of determining the adverse claim.

(b) Action for the purpose of establishing
title to a parcel of real property of five acres or less may be brought by any
person who has been in adverse possession of the real property for not less
than twenty years. Action for the purpose of establishing title to a parcel of
real property of greater than five acres may be brought by any person who had
been in adverse possession of the real property for not less than twenty years
prior to November 7, 1978, or for not less than earlier applicable time periods
of adverse possession. For purposes of this section, any person claiming title
by adverse possession shall show that such person acted in good faith. Good
faith means that, under all the facts and circumstances, a reasonable person
would believe that the person has an interest in title to the lands in question
and such belief is based on inheritance, a written instrument of conveyance, or
the judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(c) Action brought to claim property of five
acres or less on the basis of adverse possession may be asserted in good faith
by any person not more than once in twenty years, after November 7, 1978.

(d) Action under subsection (a) or (b) shall
be brought in the circuit court of the circuit in which the property is
situated.

(e) Action may be brought by any person to
quiet title to land by accretion; provided that no action shall be brought by
any person other than the State to quiet title to land accreted along the ocean
after May 20, 2003, except that a private property owner whose eroded land has
been restored by accretion may also bring such an action for the restored
portion. The person bringing the action shall prove by a preponderance of the
evidence that the accretion is natural and permanent and that the land accreted
before or on May 20, 2003. The person bringing the action shall supply the
office of environmental quality control with notice of the action for publication
in the office's periodic bulletin in compliance with section 343-3(c)(4). The
quiet title action shall not be decided by the court unless the office of
environmental quality control has properly published notice of the action in
the office's periodic bulletin.

As used in this section, "permanent"
means that the accretion has been in existence for at least twenty years. The
accreted portion of land shall be considered within the conservation district.
Land accreted after May 20, 2003, shall be public land except as otherwise
provided in this section. Prohibited uses are governed by section 183-45. [L
1890, c 18, §1; RL 1925, §2757; RL 1935, §4390; RL 1945, §10451; am L Sp 1949,
c 46, §1(a); RL 1955, §242-1; am L 1959, c 52, §1; am L 1967, c 258, §1; HRS
§669-1; am L 1972, c 90, §12(a); am L 1973, c 26, §2; am L 1979, c 157, §3; am
L 1983, c 222, §1; am L 1985, c 221, §3; gen ch 1985; am L 2003, c 73, §5; am L
2012, c 56, §3]

Cross References

Constitutional provisions, see Const. art. XVI, §12.

Venue, see §603-36.

Rules of Court

Applicability of HRCP, see HRCP rule 81(b).

Law Journals and Reviews

Adverse Possession Against Unknown Claimants Under Land Court
and Quiet Title Procedures. 2 HBJ, no. 2, at 4 (1964).

Adverse Possession and Quiet Title Actions in Hawaii --
Recent Constitutional Developments. 19 HBJ, no. 1, at 59 (1985).

Beach Access: A Public Right? 23 HBJ, no. 1, at 65 (1991).

Public Beach Access: A Right for All? Opening the Gate to
Iroquois Point Beach. 30 UH L. Rev. 495 (2008).

From Sea to Rising Sea: How Climate Change Challenges
Coastal Land Use Laws. 33 UH L. Rev. 289 (2010).

The Wash of the Waves: How the Stroke of a Pen
Recharacterized Accreted Lands as Public Property. 34 UH L. Rev. 525 (2012).

Case Notes

Downstream owners may acquire water rights by adverse use
against upstream owner who has never used upstream owner's rights during
prescriptive period. 441 F. Supp. 559 (1977).

Count of complaint did not allege the necessary elements of a
quiet title cause of action, where plaintiffs cited no authority for their
argument that defendant mortgage loan servicer's actions sending bills and
demanding payment, constituted an estate or interest in real property, as
necessary to state a claim under this section. 901 F. Supp. 2d 1253 (2012).

If plaintiff's theory was that defendant mortgage loan
servicer wrongfully asserted a cloud on the title by threatening to foreclose
when defendant's ownership interest had been terminated, plaintiffs' claim was
barred by the tender rule; plaintiffs failed to allege that they paid off the
note or were prepared to tender all amounts owing. 901 F. Supp. 2d 1253
(2012).

Moving defendants were entitled to judgment as a matter of
law, where plaintiffs had not presented any evidence indicating that they were
able to tender the outstanding amount on their loan. 911 F. Supp. 2d 916
(2012).

Par. (a): Statutory remedy under this chapter compared with
equitable remedy. 46 H. 1, 373 P.2d 710 (1962).

Essentials of adverse possession in cases involving
cotenants. 52 H. 537, 481 P.2d 109 (1971).

When evidence as to adverse possession is clear and
undisputed, question becomes one of law. 55 H. 30, 514 P.2d 572
(1973).

Actual possession of part of a parcel of land, under a deed
purporting to convey the whole of the parcel, is constructive adverse
possession to all of the parcel not in possession of another. 57 H. 64, 549
P.2d 740 (1976).

Exclusivity of possession is essential to claim of adverse
possession. 57 H. 172, 552 P.2d 77 (1976).

Burden is on plaintiff to prove title, and if plaintiff
fails, not necessary for defendant to make any showing. 58 H. 106, 566 P.2d
725 (1977).

Payment of taxes is only one factor to be considered in the
determination of adverse possession. 58 H. 362, 569 P.2d 352
(1972).

Though courts have not sanctioned use of section to quiet
title to water per se, it may be used to quiet title to real property with
appurtenant riparian water rights. 65 H. 641, 658 P.2d 287
(1982).

Claimants failed to establish prima facie case of hostile and
exclusive possession for entire twenty-year period where evidence of actual
notice to other claimants insufficient and time period of possession unclear.
86 H. 76, 947 P.2d 944 (1997).

Where claimant failed to rebut presumption that claimant's
possession of property remained permissive by providing evidence that claimant
or claimant's predecessor-in-interest converted possession from permissive to
hostile, claimant failed to prove it was entitled to the fee simple interest in
the property based on adverse possession. 90 H. 289, 978 P.2d 727 (1999).

Appeals court erred in determining that summary judgment was
proper in quiet title action for subject property where, viewed in the light
most favorable to defendants, there were genuine issues of material fact as to
whether a cotenancy existed among plaintiff and defendants and, if a cotenancy
did exist, whether plaintiff acted in good faith towards its cotenant. 114 H.
24, 155 P.3d 1125 (2007).

In a quiet title action, defendant cannot set up title in
stranger to defeat claim. 1 H. App. 573, 623, P.2d 885 (1981).

Color of title is not indispensable to prove title by adverse
possession if the other necessary elements are shown to exist and are not explained.
2 H. App. 1, 625 P.2d 378 (1981).

Possession of property to fence by occupier who believed the
fence marked occupier's boundary line constituted adverse possession. 2 H.
App. 234, 629 P.2d 1151 (1981).

Savings clause in 1973 amendment requires application of
prior law's ten-year period of limitations in adverse possession case. 3 H.
App. 11, 639 P.2d 1119 (1982).

Article XVI §12 of the Hawaii constitution does not bar
adverse possession claims to more than five acres of land where claim matured
prior to November 7, 1978; this section is a reasonable construction of article
XVI, §12. 91 H. 545 (App.), 985 P.2d 1112 (1999).

Claimant established prima facie case of adverse possession
where claimants built, operated and leased slaughterhouse for over fifty years,
erected signs designating property, and placed and maintained fences around
property. 91 H. 545 (App.), 985 P.2d 1112 (1999).

Publicly recorded conveyances evidencing the existence of a
cotenancy in land may render a cotenant's belief that he or she had no reason
to suspect the cotenancy's existence not objectively reasonable. 91 H. 545
(App.), 985 P.2d 1112 (1999).

Where earliest point at which plaintiffs' alleged
prescriptive easement could have begun to accrue was 1986, the year
plaintiff-wife purchased the fee on the property, plaintiffs failed to meet the
twenty-year prescriptive period set forth in subsection (b). 97 H. 305 (App.),
37 P.3d 554 (1999).

Cited: 907 F. Supp. 2d 1165 (2012); 73 H. 297, 832 P.2d 724 (1992).

Cases prior to adoption of the Hawaii Rules of Civil
Procedure.

An admitted valid interest need not be submitted to jury. 10
H. 507 (1896). Probate proceedings. 20 H. 653 (1911). Admissions by former pleadings. 22 H. 51 (1914). Defendant cannot defeat by claim of title in
stranger. 22 H. 465 (1915). Prescription vs. lost
grant. 25 H. 357, 365-370 (1920), aff'd 272 F. 856 (1921). Sufficiency of evidence jury waived. 29 H. 250 (1926). Pedigree. 32 H. 1 (1931).

Equitable remedy does not affect right to pursue this
statutory remedy to quiet title. 10 H. 507 (1896).
Equitable remedy available. 12 H. 12 (1899); 15 H. 308 (1903); 20 H. 638 (1911); 21 H. 196 (1912).

Statutory remedy is not limited to persons in possession. 10
H. 507 (1896); 14 H. 365 (1902).
As to equitable remedy. See 9 H. 555 (1894); 18 H. 415 (1907); 22 H. 510 (1915). Mortgagee,
after default, may bring action. 15 H. 52 (1903); 32 H.
323 (1932). One in possession claiming fee simple under
will may maintain action against one who, under the same will, claims remainder
in fee under certain contingencies. 22 H. 233 (1914).
When plaintiff has failed to show title, whether defendants may litigate
disputed title amongst themselves. 22 H. 644 (1915).

Judgment in statutory action. 11 H. 512
(1898). Judgment may include award of possession and be enforced by
writ of possession. 14 H. 365, 368 (1902). Whether
unexecuted judgment for possession stays statute of limitations. 14 H. 365 (1902). Incumbent on plaintiff to prove title; if plaintiff
fails, it is unnecessary for defendant to make any showing; only possible
judgment is dismissal. 22 H. 465, 466 (1915), aff'd 240
F. 97 (1917); 25 H. 246 (1919).
Abatement, prior action of ejectment. 31 H. 71 (1929).
See 37 H. 234 (1945).

Par. (b): Action based on adverse possession not in rem as
to persons who can be found. 50 H. 201, 436 P.2d 752 (1968).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next